ko: 배터리 크기: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; 내장 배터리; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; 대형 셀(가전제품/공구/탑승형 장난감); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; 소형 가정용 셀(AA/AAA/코인); 알려지지 않은; ≤100Wh; 기타
el: Μέγεθος μπαταρίας: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Ενσωματωμένη μπαταρία; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Μεγάλη κυψέλη (συσκευή/εργαλείο/ηλεκτροκίνητο παιχνίδι); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Μικρή οικιακή κυψέλη (AA/AAA/νομισματική μπαταρία); Άγνωστο; ≤100Wh; Άλλο
zh-TW: 電池容量: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 瓦時; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; 內建電池; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; 大型電池 (電器/工具/騎乘玩具); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; 小型家用電池 (AA/AAA/硬幣型); 未知; ≤ 100 瓦時; 其他
hu: Akkumulátor mérete: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12 V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Beépített akkumulátor; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Nagy elem  (készülék/szerszám/játék); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Kis háztartási elem (AA/AAA/gomb); Ismeretlen; ≤100 Wh; Egyéb
de: Batteriegröße: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12 V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Eingebaute Batterie; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Große Zelle (Haushaltsgerät/Werkzeug/Aufsitzspielzeug); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Kleine Haushaltszelle (AA/AAA/Knopfzelle); Unbekannt; ≤100Wh; Sonstiges
nl: Batterijgrootte: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Ingebouwde batterij; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Grote batterij (apparaat/gereedschap/speelgoed om op te rijden); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Kleine huishoudelijke batterij (AA/AAA/munt); Onbekend; ≤100Wh; Andere
cs: Velikost baterie: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12 V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Integrovaná baterie; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Velká baterie (spotřebič / nářadí / pojízdná hračka); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Malá baterie pro domácnost (AA/AAA/knoflíková); Stav neznámý; ≤ 100 Wh; Jiné
ru: Размер аккумулятора: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12 В; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 В; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 В; 9 В; >100 Вт·ч; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Встроенный аккумулятор; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Большой аккумулятор (для бытовой техники / инструментов / игрушечных транспортных средств); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Малый бытовой аккумулятор (AA/AAA/монетный); Неизвестно; ≤100 Вт·ч; Другое
vi: Dung lượng pin: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Pin gắn trong; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Pin lớn (thiết bị/dụng cụ/đồ chơi dạng lái); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Pin tiểu gia dụng (AA/AAA/đồng xu); Không rõ; ≤100Wh; Khác
sv: Batteristorlek: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12 V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Inbyggt batteri; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Stor battericell (apparat/verktyg/åk-leksak); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Små batterier för hushåll (AA/AAA/myntbatteri); Okänd; ≤ 100 Wh; Annat
fr: Taille de la batterie: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Batterie intégrée; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Grande cellule (appareil/outil/jouet à enfourcher); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Petite cellule domestique (AA/AAA/pièce); Inconnu; ≤ 100 Wh; Autre
zh-CN: 电池尺寸: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 瓦时; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; 内置电池; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; 大型电池（电器/工具/骑乘玩具）; MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; 小型家用电池（AA/AAA/纽扣电池）; 未知; ≤100 瓦时; 其他
fi: Akun koko: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Sisäänrakennettu akku; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Suuri kenno (laite/työkalu/lelu); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Pieni kotitalousparisto (AA/AAA/nappiparisto); Tuntematon; ≤100 Wh; Muu
pl: Rozmiar akumulatora: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Wbudowany akumulator; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; K; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Duża bateria (urządzenie/narzędzie/jeździk); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Mała bateria do użytku domowego (AA/AAA/pastylkowa); Nieznana; ≤100 Wh; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Tamanho da bateria: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Bateria embutida; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Célula grande (eletrodoméstico/ferramenta/brinquedo de montar); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Pilha doméstica pequena (AA/AAA/moeda); Desconhecido; ≤ 100Wh; Outro
it: Capacità batteria: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Batteria da incasso; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Pila grande (elettrodomestico/utensile/giocattolo cavalcabile); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Piccole pile domestiche (AA/AAA/moneta); Sconosciuto; ≤100 Wh; Altro
es: Tamaño de la batería: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Batería incorporada; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Celda grande (electrodoméstico/herramienta/juguete para montar); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Celda doméstica pequeña (AA/AAA/moneda); Desconocido; ≤100 Wh; Otros
nb: Batteristørrelse: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Innebygd batteri; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Stor celle (apparat/verktøy/kjøreleke); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Liten husholdningscelle (AA/AAA/mynt); Ukjent; ≤ 100 Wh; Annen
sl-SI: Velikost baterije: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Vgrajena baterija; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Velika baterija (aparati/orodje/vozila na baterijski pogon); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Majhna gospodinjska baterija (AA/AAA/kovanec); Neznano; ≤100Wh; Drugo
ja: バッテリーサイズ: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; 内蔵バッテリー; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; 大型セル（家電・工具・乗用玩具）; MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; 家庭用小型電池（単三電池/単四電池/コイン型電池）; 不明; ≤100Wh; その他
th: ขนาดแบตเตอรี่: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; มีแบตเตอรี่ในตัว; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; เซลล์แบตเตอรี่ขนาดใหญ่ (เครื่องใช้ไฟฟ้า/เครื่องมือ/ของเล่นแบบนั่งขับ); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; เซลล์แบตเตอรี่สำหรับครัวเรือนขนาดเล็ก (AA/AAA/ถ่านก้อนกระดุม); ไม่ทราบ; ≤100Wh; อื่นๆ
da: Batteristørrelse: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Indbygget batteri; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Stor celle (apparat/værktøj/legetøjskøretøj); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Lille husholdningscelle (AA/AAA/møntbatteri); Ukendt; 100Wh; Andet
hr-HR: Veličina baterije: 1/2 AA; 1/3 AAA; 1/3 N; 10; 12 V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3 AA; 2/3 AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Ugrađena baterija; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Velika ćelija (uređaj / alat / vozilo za djecu); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Mala kućna ćelija (AA/AAA/kovanica); Nepoznato; ≤ 100 Wh; Ostalo
sk-SK: Veľkosť batérie: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Vstavaná batéria; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Veľká bunka (spotrebič/náradie/hračka na vozenie); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Malá domáca batéria (AA/AAA/plochá); Neznáme; ≤ 100 Wh; Iné
en: Battery size: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Built-in battery; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Large cell (appliance/tool/ride-on toy); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Small household cell (AA/AAA/coin); Unknown; ≤100Wh; Other
pt-PT: Tamanho da bateria: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Bateria integrada; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Célula grande (eletrodoméstico/ferramenta/brinquedo de montar); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Pilha doméstica pequena (AA/AAA/moeda); Desconhecido; ≤100Wh; Outro
lt-LT: Maitinimo elemento dydis: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Integruotas akumuliatorius; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Didelis elementas (prietaisas / įrankis / žaislas); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Mažas namų ūkio elementas (AA/AAA/monetinis); Nežinoma; ≤100 Wh; Kita
bg-BG: Размер на батерията: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Вградена батерия; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Голяма батерия (уред/инструмент/играчка за яздене или возене); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Малка битова батерия (AA/AAA/бутонна); Неизвестен; ≤100 Wh; Други
ro-RO: Dimensiune baterie: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4,5 V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6 V; 9 V; >100Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Baterie încorporată; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Celulă mare (aparat/unealtă/jucărie de călărit); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Celulă mică de uz casnic (AA/AAA/monedă); Necunoscut; ≤100Wh; Altele
tr: Pil Kapasitesi: 1/2AA; 1/3AAA; 1/3N; 10; 12V; 13; 14500; 16340; 18490; 18650; 2/3AA; 2/3AAA; 21700; 312; 395; 3LR12; 4.5V; 4LR44; 4SR44; 675; 6LR61; 6V; 9V; >100 Wh; A; A23; A27; AA; AAA; AAAA; B; BR1225; Dahili batarya; C; CR1025; CR1216; CR1220; CR1225; CR123; CR123A; CR1616; CR1620; CR1632; CR2; CR2012; CR2016; CR2025; CR2032; CR2320; CR2325; CR2330; CR2354; CR2430; CR2450; CR2477; CR3032; D; F; LR06; LR1130; LR14; LR27A; LR32A; LR41; LR43; LR44; LR54; LR60; LR66; Büyük hücre (cihaz/alet/üzerine binilebilen oyuncak); MN11; MN21; MN27; N; PR41; PR44; PR70; SC; SR41; SR42; SR43; SR43W; SR44; SR45; SR48; SR54; SR55; SR57; SR58; SR59; SR60; SR616SW; SR63; SR66; SR69; SR731SW; SR920SW; SR936SW; Küçük ev tipi pil (AA/AAA/madeni para); Bilinmeyen; ≤100 Wh; Diğer